Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-374
Alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation; department; duties.

(1) The department shall investigate each case of alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult and shall provide such adult protective services as are necessary and appropriate under the circumstances.

(2) In each case of alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation, the department may make a request for further assistance from the appropriate law enforcement agency or initiate such action as may be appropriate under the circumstances.

(3) The department shall make a written report or case summary to the appropriate law enforcement agency and to the registry of all reported cases of abuse, neglect, or exploitation and action taken.

(4) The department shall deliver a written report or case summary to the appropriate county attorney if the investigation indicates a reasonable cause to believe that a violation of section 28-386 has occurred.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 27;

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 12;

Laws 2016, LB934, § 8.